Utah statutes.
10-9a-502.   Preparation and adoption of land use ordinance or zoning map.

(1)  The planning commission shall:

(a)  provide notice as required by Subsection 10-9a-205(1)(a);

(b)  hold a public hearing on a proposed land use ordinance or zoning map; and

(c)  prepare and recommend to the legislative body a proposed land use ordinance or ordinances and zoning map that represent the planning commission's recommendation for regulating the use and development of land within all or any part of the area of the municipality.

(2)  The municipal legislative body shall consider each proposed land use ordinance and zoning map recommended to it by the planning commission, and, after providing notice as required by Subsection 10-9a-205(1)(b) and holding a public meeting, the legislative body may adopt or reject the ordinance or map either as proposed by the planning commission or after making any revision the municipal legislative body considers appropriate.

